Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202671-3413
Legislative findings and declarations; purpose of act.

(1) The Legislature finds and declares that it is in the best interests of the state, its residents, and especially the families of this state, that the number and causes of death related to domestic abuse be examined. There is a need for a comprehensive integrated review of all domestic abuse deaths in Nebraska and a system for statewide retrospective review of existing records relating to each domestic abuse death.

(2) The purpose of the Domestic Abuse Death Review Act is to prevent future domestic abuse deaths by:

(a) Providing for the examination of the incidence, causes, and contributing factors of domestic abuse deaths in Nebraska; and

(b) Developing recommendations for changes within communities, public and private agencies, institutions, and systems, based on an analysis of these causes and contributing factors which may serve to prevent future domestic abuse deaths.

Laws 2022, LB741, § 38.